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DTC P11 26/89* Magnetic Clutch Circuit Malfunction

*: ETCS trouble code No. is 22.

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Magnetic clutch is mounted between the throttle motor and the valve, and it connects the throttle motor with
the throttle valve.
Therefore, the throttle motor opens and closes the throttle valve through the magnetic clutch.
If the electric throttle control system has a malfunction, the magnetic clutch separates the throttle motor from
the throttle valve in order not to operate the throttle valve by the throttle motor.
If this DTC is stored, the engine ECU shuts down the power for the throttle motor and the magnetic clutch,
and the throttle valve is fully closed by the return spring.
However, the opening angle of the throttle valve can be controlled by the accelerator pedal through the
throttle cable.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1126/89

Condition (a) continue for 0.8 seconds:
(a) Magnetic clutch current 1.4 A or  0.4 A S Open or short in magnetic clutch circuit

M ti l t hP11 26/89
Condition (a) continues for 1.5 seconds:
(a) Magnetic clutch current 1.0 A or  0.8 A

S Magnetic clutch
S Engine ECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P11 25/89 (Throttle Control Motor Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−85 for the
WIRING DIAGRAM.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −
fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the timeof themalfunction.

1 Checkmagneticclutchcircuit.

Whenusinghand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandhand −held testermain

switch ON.
CHECK:
Read themagneticclutchcurrentvalueon thehand −held tes-
ter.
OK:

Current:0.8 − 1.0A
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When not using hand−held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the oscilloscope between terminals CL+ and

CL− of the engine ECU.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Check the waveform between terminals CL+ and CL− of the en-
gine ECU when engine is idling.
OK:

The correct waveform is as shown.

NG Go to step 4.

OK

2 Check magnetic clutch.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the throttle control motor and magnetic clutch con-
nector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 3 and 4 of the throttle
control motor and magnetic clutch.
OK:

Resistance: 4.2 − 5.2 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Replace throttle control motor (with magnetic
clutch) (See page FI−45).

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between magnetic clutch
and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace.

OK
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4 Check operation of magnetic clutch.

CHECK:
(a) Clear the DTC.
(b) Perform the following steps and check the DTC.

(1) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(2) Start the engine.
(3) Turn the ignition switch OFF and wait 3 seconds.
(4) Turn the ignition switch ON.

OK:
DTC P11 26/89 is not stored

NG Replace throttle control motor (with magnetic
clutch) (See page FI−45).

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


